Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.065

Members.

A corporation may have one or more classes of members. The designation of such class or classes, the manner of election, appointment or admission to membership, and the qualifications, responsibilities and rights of the members of each class shall be set forth in the articles of incorporation. A corporation may issue certificates evidencing membership therein. Certificates may be assigned by a member and reacquired by the corporation under such provisions, rules and regulations as may be prescribed in the articles of incorporation. Membership may be terminated under such provisions, rules and regulations as may be prescribed in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 13.]